Washington statutes.
RCW 19.112.120

Motor vehicle fuel licensees—Required sales of denatured ethanol—Rules—Limitation of section.

(1) By December 1, 2008, motor vehicle fuel licensees under chapter 82.38 RCW, as determined by the department of licensing, must provide evidence to the department of licensing that at least two percent of total gasoline sold in Washington, measured on a quarterly basis, is denatured ethanol.

(2) If the director of ecology determines that ethanol content greater than two percent of the total gasoline sold in Washington will not jeopardize continued attainment of the federal clean air act's national ambient air quality standard for ozone pollution in Washington and the director of agriculture determines and publishes this determination in the Washington State Register that sufficient raw materials are available within Washington to support economical production of ethanol at higher levels, the director of agriculture may require by rule that licensees provide evidence to the department of licensing that denatured ethanol comprises between two percent and at least ten percent of total gasoline sold in Washington, measured on a quarterly basis.

(3) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section may take effect no sooner than one hundred eighty days after the determination has been published in the Washington State Register.

(4) The director and the director of licensing must each adopt rules, in coordination with each other, for enforcing and carrying out the purposes of this section.

(5) Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit the production, sale, or use of motor fuel for use in federally designated flexibly fueled vehicles capable of using E85 motor fuel. Nothing in this section is intended to limit the use of high octane gasoline not blended with ethanol for use in aircraft.

(6) To the extent that the requirements of this section conflict with the requirements of chapter 70A.535 RCW, the requirements of chapter 70A.535 RCW prevail.

[ 2021 c 317 s 27; 2013 c 225 s 602; 2007 c 309 s 2; 2006 c 338 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—2021 c 317: See note following RCW 70A.535.005.

Effective date—2013 c 225: See note following RCW 82.38.010.

Findings—Intent—2006 c 338: See note following RCW 19.112.110.